Kentucky statutes. TITLE XVII Economic Security and Public Welfare
Penalties

199.990.
Penalties.

Any person who violates any of the provisions of KRS 199.430, 199.470, 199.473, 199.570, 199.572, and 199.590 except subsection (2), or 199.640 to 199.670, or any rule or regulation under such sections the violation of which is made unlawful shall be fined not less than five hundred dollars ($500) nor more than two thousand dollars ($2,000) or imprisoned for not more than six (6) months, or both. Each day such violation continues shall constitute a separate offense.

Any person who willfully violates any other of the provisions of KRS 199.420 to 199.670 or any rule or regulation thereunder, the violation of which is made unlawful under the terms of those sections, and for which no other penalty is prescribed in those sections, or in any other applicable statute, shall be fined not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than two hundred dollars ($200) or imprisoned for not more than thirty (30) days, or both.

Any violation of the regulations, standards, or requirements of the cabinet under the provisions of KRS 199.896 that poses an immediate threat to the health, safety, or welfare of any child served by the child-care center shall be subject to a civil penalty of no more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each occurrence. Treble penalties shall be assessed for two (2) or more violations within twelve (12) months. All money collected as a result of civil penalties assessed under the provisions of KRS 199.896 shall be paid into the State Treasury and credited to a special fund for the purpose of the Early Childhood Scholarship Program created in accordance with KRS 164.518. The balance of the fund shall not lapse to the general fund at the end of each biennium.

A person who commits a violation of the regulations, standards, or requirements of the cabinet under the provisions of KRS 199.896 shall be fined not less than one thousand dollars ($1,000) or imprisoned for not more than twelve (12) months, or be fined and imprisoned, at the discretion of the court.

Any person who violates any of the provisions of KRS 199.590(2) shall be guilty of a Class D felony.

Any person who knowingly or intentionally registers false information under KRS 199.503(4) shall be fined not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) or imprisoned for not more than twelve (12) months, or be fined and imprisoned, at the discretion of the court.

Any person who knowingly or intentionally releases or requests confidential information in violation of KRS 199.503(8) or (9) or in violation of KRS 199.505 shall be fined not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) or imprisoned for not more than twelve (12) months, or be fined and imprisoned, at the discretion of the court. It is a defense under this subsection if the cabinet releases confidential information while acting in good faith and with reasonable diligence.

HISTORY:
326, 327, 330, 331c-1, 331c-3, 331e-4, 331g-1 to 331g-3: amend. Acts 1944, ch. 77, § 1; 1946, ch. 13, § 5; 1950, ch. 125, § 31; 1952, ch. 161, § 61; 1962, ch. 196, § 4; 1962, ch. 211, § 6; 1962, ch. 212, § 12; 1964, ch. 85, § 5; 1970, ch. 270, § 1; 1976, ch. 142, § 3; 1978, ch. 66, § 3, effective June 17, 1978; 1980, ch. 188, effective July 15, 1980; 1986, ch. 423, § 196, effective July 1, 1987; 1994, ch. 242, § 13, effective July 15, 1994; 2000, ch. 308, § 24, effective July 14, 2000; 2004, ch. 186, § 10, effective July 13, 2004; 2018 ch. 112, § 4, effective July 14, 2018; 2018 ch. 159, § 31, effective July 14, 2018.